Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-239
Domestic stock company; change to mutual company; plan; modification by director.

If the Director of Insurance proposes modifications in the proposed plan for mutualization or amendments to the articles of incorporation, he or she shall make such proposals in the form of a written order approving the plan only upon the condition that such modifications be promptly made thereto and approved by a two-thirds vote of the board of directors and adopted by the owners of at least two-thirds of the stock of the company. The order shall in all other respects follow the form and contain the provisions of an order approving such plan as set out in section 44-238 and shall be similarly forwarded to the shareholders of the company.

Laws 1953, c. 152, § 7, p. 484;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 85.